Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.440

University hospital.

The board of regents of the University of Washington is hereby authorized to operate a hospital upon university grounds to be used in conjunction with the university's medical and dental schools, including equipping and additional construction to the same.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.440. Cf. (i) 1947 c 286 s 2. No RRS. (ii) 1945 c 15 s 4. No RRS.]